Illinois, session 104th, SB2995.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Artificial intelligence commercial 8communication disclosure.9    (a) As used in this Section, "artificial intelligence" has 10the meaning set forth in Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human 11Rights Act.12    (b) A person shall not use artificial intelligence while 13engaging in trade and commerce to communicate with a consumer 14in a manner that may mislead or deceive a reasonable consumer 15into believing that the consumer is engaging with a human, 16unless the consumer is notified in a clear and conspicuous 17manner that the consumer is not engaging with a human.18    (c) A person shall not use artificial intelligence to sell 19or offer to sell goods or services unless the consumer is 20notified in a clear and conspicuous manner that artificial 21intelligence is being used to sell or offer to sell goods or 22services and the consumer is given an option to request more 23information regarding the specific use of the artificial   SB2995- 2 -LRB104 17897 SPS 31333 b1intelligence.2    (d) A business entity that uses artificial intelligence 3while engaging in trade and commerce to communicate with a 4consumer shall give the consumer the option to communicate 5with a human during the business entity's ordinary business 6hours. A business entity shall not prohibit a consumer from 7requesting to communicate with a human during the business 8entity's normal business hours or charge a fee to communicate 9with a human instead of artificial intelligence.10    (e) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 11practice within the meaning of this Act.